Arkansas statutes. Title 12 Law Enforcement, Emergency Management, and Military Affairs
Chapter 12

Crime Reporting and Investigations

12-12-102. Authority to investigate and arrest in contiguous county.

12-12-326. Autopsies — Line-of-duty death — Definitions.

Subchapter 14

— Task Force on Racial Profiling

Subchapter 1

— Fire Prevention Act

12-13-101. Title.

This subchapter shall be known as the “Fire Prevention Act”.

History.

Acts 1955, No. 254, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-806.

12-13-102. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Building” means any structure, framework, or housing, public or private;

[Repealed.]

“Fire hazard” means any building, premises, place, or thing which by reason of its nature, location, occupancy, condition, or use may cause loss, damage, or injury to persons or property by reason of fire, explosion, or action of the elements;

“Members of fire departments” includes the personnel of all departments supported wholly or partially by public funds;

“Officer” means an officer of the Division of Arkansas State Police whom the Director of the Division of Arkansas State Police may appoint or designate to execute the powers and perform the duties specified in this subchapter and also includes all peace officers as defined in subdivision (7) of this section;

“Owner” shall be given its ordinary meaning and includes any trustee or any person having a freehold interest in property.

However, a lessee or mortgagee of property shall not be deemed the owner thereof;

“Peace officer” includes every type of law enforcement officer commissioned and active within this state;

“Person” means any individual, copartnership, corporation, or voluntary association; and

“Premises” means any parcel of land, exclusive of buildings thereon, and includes parking lots, tourist camps, trailer camps, airports, stockyards, junkyards, and other places or enclosures, however owned, used, or occupied.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment repealed (2); and substituted “Division of Arkansas State Police whom the Director of the Division of Arkansas State Police” for “Department of Arkansas State Police whom the director” in (5).

History.

Acts 1955, No. 254, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-807; Acts 2019, No. 910, §§ 5859, 5860.

12-13-103. Officer's neglect of duty — Penalty.

Any officer referred to in this subchapter who neglects to comply with any requirement of this subchapter shall be guilty of a violation.

Upon conviction, the officer shall be punished by a fine of not less than twenty-five dollars ($25.00) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100) for each neglect or violation.

Amendments. The 2005 amendment substituted “violation” for “misdemeanor” in (a); and deleted “and in default of the payment thereof shall be imprisoned not to exceed thirty (30) days” from the end of (b).

Publisher's Notes. Acts 1955, No. 254, § 3, which is codified in this section, also empowered the Director of the Department of Arkansas State Police to create and maintain a Division of Fire Prevention within the department and to appoint personnel with duties, powers, and titles as he deemed necessary for the proper administration and enforcement of this subchapter.

Acts 1955, No. 254, § 18, abolished the office of State Fire Marshal as it then existed and transferred all its titles, functions, powers, duties, records, files, and other property to the Director of the Arkansas State Police.

Acts 1971, No. 38, § 14, as amended, transferred the Department of Arkansas State Police into the Department of Public Safety where it was located in the Police Division.

Acts 1975, No. 492, § 1, and a number of successor provisions contained in appropriations bills (Acts 1975 (Extended Sess., 1976), No. 1017, § 21; Acts 1979, No. 1062, § 18; and Acts 1981, No. 540, § 12), provided that a State Fire Marshal Enforcement Section be established within the Police Services Division of the Department of Public Safety and that such section should administer this subchapter.

Acts 1981, No. 45, § 3, provided, in part, that the State Fire Marshal Enforcement Section of the Police Services Division of the Department of Public Safety, and all of its powers, functions, duties, personnel, and funds would be detached from the Department of Public Safety (abolished by Acts 1981, No. 45, § 1) and transferred to the Department of Arkansas State Police. It further provided that nothing in the act would be construed so as to reduce any rights which an employee of the State Fire Marshal Enforcement Section of the Arkansas State Police would have under any civil service or merit system. The section further provided that all powers, functions, and duties added to the State Fire Marshal Enforcement Section subsequent to the enactment of Acts 1971, No. 38 would be vested in and thereafter performed by the State Fire Marshal Enforcement Section of the Arkansas State Police.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Arkansas State Police” for “Department of Arkansas State Police” throughout the section.

History.

Acts 1955, No. 254, § 9; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-814; Acts 2005, No. 1994, § 77.

12-13-104. Administration and enforcement.

The administration and enforcement of this subchapter are vested in the Division of Arkansas State Police.

The Director of the Division of Arkansas State Police is empowered to create and maintain a State Fire Marshal Enforcement Section in the Division of Arkansas State Police and to appoint such personnel with such duties, powers, and titles as he or she may deem necessary for the proper administration and enforcement of this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1955, No. 254, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-808; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 5861.

12-13-105. Duties of State Fire Marshal Enforcement Section.

The State Fire Marshal Enforcement Section shall have the responsibility to:

Provide sufficient training to the several deputy fire marshals in the State of Arkansas to enable them to better understand their duties and their authority and to motivate them to perform their duties in an effective and efficient manner;

Coordinate fire prevention efforts with other agencies and groups;

Develop and present public awareness programs in fire prevention and protection;

Develop and disseminate fire prevention information and material;

Enforce the Arkansas Fire Prevention Code and periodically revise and update the Arkansas Fire Prevention Code;

Investigate fires of a suspicious nature in the state;

Do and perform such other functions as will promote an efficient and effective fire prevention and control program in the state;

Review fire protection class code determinations by an advisory organization and determine if the evaluation of fire protection services is reasonable and appropriate; and

Upon request, make recommendations to the Insurance Commissioner concerning filings made to the commissioner concerning fire protection standards.

Publisher's Notes. Acts 1983, No. 358, § 1, transferred the authority and responsibility of the State Fire Marshal Enforcement Section of the Arkansas State Police to establish an information retrieval system on fires, fire deaths, and fire injuries; to provide statistical data for evaluating current fire protection efforts; and to enable the correction of current deficiencies and the development of new methods to the Southern Arkansas University Technical Branch Fire Training Academy.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment added (8) and (9).

Cross References. Criminal acts involving explosives, §5-73-108.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 540, § 12; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-914.2; Acts 2015, No. 961, § 1.

12-13-106. Section personnel.

The members or heads of the State Fire Marshal Enforcement Section of the Division of Arkansas State Police shall be appointed and serve in the same manner as provided by law for the operation of other divisions of the Division of Arkansas State Police.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 45, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-914.2a; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 5862.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Arkansas State Police” for “Department of Arkansas State Police”.

12-13-107. Director of the Division of Arkansas State Police — Duties generally.

It shall be the duty of the Director of the Division of Arkansas State Police and his or her officers and deputies to enforce all laws and ordinances with regard to the following:

The prevention of fires;

The storage, sale, and use of combustibles and explosives;

The installation and maintenance of automatic or other fire alarm systems and fire extinguishing equipment;

The construction, maintenance, and regulation of fire escapes;

The means and adequacy of exits in case of fire from factories, asylums, hospitals, churches, schools, halls, theaters, and all other places in which numbers of people work, live, or congregate from time to time, for any purpose; and

The suppression of arson and the investigation of the cause, origin, and circumstances of fires.

The director is empowered to adopt reasonable rules for the effective administration of this subchapter to accomplish its intent and purposes, and to safeguard the public from fire hazards.

The director shall make reasonable rules for the keeping, storing, using, manufacture, selling, handling, transportation, or other disposition of highly inflammable materials and rubbish, gunpowder, dynamite, crude petroleum or any of its products, explosives or compounds or any other explosive, including fireworks, and firecrackers, and he or she may prescribe the materials and construction of receptacles and buildings to be used for any of those purposes.

Nothing in this subchapter shall apply to the inspection of boilers, § 20-23-101 et seq., the administration and enforcement of which is now vested in the Division of Labor.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment by No. 315 deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (b); and substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (c).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Arkansas State Police” for “Department of Arkansas State Police” in the introductory language of (a); and substituted “Division of Labor” for “Department of Labor” in (d).

History.

Acts 1955, No. 254, §§ 5, 6; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 82-810, 82-811; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 873; 2019, No. 910, §§
5402, 5863.

12-13-108. Ex officio deputies.

All mayors, members of fire departments, and peace officers shall be ex officio deputies to the Director of the Division of Arkansas State Police. They shall be subject to the duties and obligations imposed by this subchapter in fire prevention and in the investigation of the cause, origin, and circumstances of fires within their jurisdiction.

History.

Acts 1955, No. 254, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-809; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 5864.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Arkansas State Police” for “Department of Arkansas State Police” in the first sentence.

12-13-109. Fire drills.

It shall be the duty of the Director of the Division of Arkansas State Police, his or her officers, and deputies to require teachers of public and private schools and all educational institutions to have one (1) fire drill each month and to keep all doors and exits unlocked during school hours.

History.

Acts 1955, No. 254, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-813; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 5865.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Arkansas State Police” for “Department of Arkansas State Police”.

Cross References. Fire marshal program, §6-10-110.

12-13-110. Inspection of buildings.

Upon complaint of any person or on their own motion, the Director of the Division of Arkansas State Police and his or her officers or deputies may inspect all buildings and premises within their jurisdiction and issue an order for the compliance with the director's rules.

Failure or refusal to comply with an order of the director in the enforcement of the rules shall be a Class A misdemeanor.

The director and his or her officers and deputies shall inspect all places of public assembly, including factories or industrial plants normally employing ten (10) or more persons, where hazards to the lives and safety of citizens might be present.

If upon completion of the inspection an unsafe or hazardous condition is found to exist, then the director shall promptly notify the owner or operator of the public assembly in writing.

Upon the receipt of the written notice, the owner or operator shall remove the hazardous or unsafe condition.

On failure to remedy the condition, the director may file injunction proceedings in the circuit court of the jurisdiction to abate the condition as being a nuisance.

The suit shall be filed in the name of the director for the use and benefit of the State of Arkansas without bond for costs.

Amendments. The 2005 amendment substituted “Class A misdemeanor” for “misdemeanor and punishable as such” in (a)(2).

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (a)(1) and (a)(2).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Arkansas State Police” for “Department of Arkansas State Police” in (a)(1).

Cross References. Fines, §5-4-201.

Imprisonment, §5-4-401.

(1)The deputies to the Director of the Division of Arkansas State Police shall investigate each fire causing loss of life or damage to property within their jurisdiction to determine if the fire was caused by negligence or design.

On his or her own motion and at any time, the director may investigate the origin and circumstances of any fire in this state without restraint or liability for trespass.

Any building or premises may be inspected along with the contents and occupancy thereof.

On request, every fire insurance company licensed in this state shall furnish to the director any information it may have concerning any fire in this state.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Arkansas State Police” for “Department of Arkansas State Police” in (a)(1).

Of subpoena to compel the attendance of witnesses to testify at the inquiry and for the production of books, records, papers, other writings, or things deemed material to the inquiry;

To administer oaths or affirmations of witnesses; and

To cause testimony to be taken stenographically, transcribed, and preserved.

Witnesses may be kept separate and apart from each other and not allowed to communicate with one another until they have been examined.

Willful false swearing by any witness shall be deemed perjury and be punishable as such.

In case of disobedience of a subpoena, the director or his or her deputy may invoke the aid of the proper circuit court of the jurisdiction to compel the attendance and testimony of witnesses and production of books, papers, written material, and things incident to the inquiry.

The circuit court is empowered to punish as a contempt any disobedience or refusal to obey a subpoena.

No person shall be excused from testifying or producing any books, records, papers, or things, or upon any hearing, when ordered to do so, upon the ground that the testimony or evidence may tend to incriminate him or her or subject him or her to a criminal penalty.

However, no person shall be prosecuted or subjected to criminal liability for or on account of any transaction made or thing concerning which he or she may testify or produce evidence, documentary or otherwise, before the director or his or her deputy.

No person so testifying shall be exempt from prosecution and punishment for perjury committed in his or her testimony.

The prosecuting attorney of any district, upon request of the director or his or her officer or deputy, shall assist in any investigation when called upon to do so.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Arkansas State Police” for “Department of Arkansas State Police” in (a).

History.

Acts 1955, No. 254, §§ 7, 11; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 82-812, 82-816; Acts 2005, No. 1994, § 199; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 874; 2019, No. 910, § 5866.

12-13-111. Investigation of fires.

If it appears that a fire is of suspicious origin or that a crime has been committed in connection therewith, the deputy shall immediately notify the director, who shall promptly initiate an inquiry to ascertain the cause of the fire and the person, if any, responsible therefor.

History.

Acts 1955, No. 254, § 12; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-817; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 5867.

12-13-112. Inquiries.

When the Director of the Division of Arkansas State Police or any officer or deputy has reason to believe that a crime or other offense has been committed in connection with any fire, the director or his or her deputy may conduct an inquiry in relation thereto.

The inquiry shall be held at such time and place as the director or his or her deputy shall determine.

The director or his or her deputy shall have the power:

The inquiry or examination may be public or private as the director or his or her deputy may determine, and persons other than those required to be present may be excluded from the place thereof.

History.

Acts 1955, No. 254, §§ 13, 14; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 82-818, 82-819; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 5868.

12-13-113. Service of process, order, or notice.

Any officer of the Department of Arkansas State Police may serve any order, notice, or process issued under the authority of this subchapter. The officer may make a return of service in the same manner as required by law for the return of service of process by a county sheriff of a county.

History.

Acts 1955, No. 254, § 15; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-820.

12-13-114. Civil actions.

No act taken by the Director of the Division of Arkansas State Police shall affect the rights of any policy holder or of any insurance company with regard to a loss by reason of any fire which the director has investigated.

The result of any investigation shall not be given in evidence upon the trial of any civil action upon any policy.

No statement made by any insurance company, its officers or agents, or by anyone representing the insurance company or its officers or agents, made with reference to the origin, cause, or supposed origin or cause of the fire to the director or his or her officers or deputies shall be admitted in evidence or made the basis for any civil action for damages.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Arkansas State Police” for “Department of Arkansas State Police” in (a)(1).

History.

Acts 1955, No. 254, § 16; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-821; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 5869.

12-13-115. Annual report to Governor.

Annually on or before July 1, the Director of the Division of Arkansas State Police shall transmit to the Governor a full report of his or her proceedings under this subchapter, including statistics and recommendations he or she may deem advisable.

History.

Acts 1955, No. 254, § 17; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-822; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 5870.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Arkansas State Police” for “Department of Arkansas State Police”.

12-13-116. Disposition of penalties, fees, and forfeitures.

All penalties, fees, or forfeitures collected under the provisions of this subchapter shall be deposited into the State Treasury to the credit of the Department of Arkansas State Police Fund.

History.

Acts 1955, No. 254, § 10; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-815.

12-13-117. Temporary door barricade devices.

A person may install and use a temporary door barricade device or security lockdown device for security purposes to protect individuals during active shooter events or other similar situations.

History.

Acts 2015, No. 606, § 1.

12-13-118. Americans with Disabilities Act compliance.

When the Arkansas Fire Prevention Code conflicts with the 2010 Americans with Disabilities Act Standards for Accessible Design, the conflicting provisions of the 2010 Americans with Disabilities Act Standards for Accessible Design shall control.

History.

Acts 2015, No. 874, § 1.

12-13-119. Review of fire protection class code determinations by advisory organizations — Recommendations to Insurance Commissioner.

The State Fire Marshal Enforcement Section may review fire protection standards filings filed by an advisory organization with the Insurance Commissioner if:

The filing is based on the effectiveness of fire protection services; and

Upon request of the commissioner or a person affected by a rate filing.

The section shall review a fire protection class code determination by:

Reassessing the fire protection services of each area of the state under approved standards to determine whether or not the analysis of the area's fire protection services were graded accurately considering the area's concerns, characteristics, and equipment and support available for fire protection services;

Advising the commissioner if the fire protection class code determination is reasonable and appropriate; and

Recommending further review or action by the commissioner concerning the fire protection class code determination.

A recommendation by the section is not binding on the commissioner.

The section shall make its recommendations under this section to the commissioner within thirty (30) days after receipt of a request to review a fire protection standards filing.

The section shall draw upon the experience and knowledge of different individuals in this state to make an informed recommendation to the commissioner.

Publisher's Notes. Acts 1987, No. 928, § 11, transferred the Arkansas Fire Training Academy at Camden, and its properties and funds, to the control of the State Board of Vocational Education (abolished and transferred to the State Board of Workforce Education and Career Opportunities) to be under the direction of the Director of the Vocational and Technical Education Division (abolished and transferred to the Department of Workforce Education). It also provided that Academy personnel who were members of a state retirement system were eligible to continue to participate in that system.

Effective Dates. Acts 1973, No. 482, § 5: Mar. 27, 1973. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the construction of a Fire Training Academy is vitally needed in providing fire service training for firemen and other individuals who are responsible for fighting fires, and that the immediate passage of this act is necessary to provide construction funds therefor. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1987, No. 928, § 16: July 1, 1987. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Sixth General Assembly that the amendments to the Revenue Stabilization Law are essential to the continued operation of state government; therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1987.”

Acts 2001, No. 178, § 3: Feb. 9, 2001. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-third General Assembly that Act 928 of 1987 purported to transfer the Fire Training Academy from Southern Arkansas University, SAU — Tech to the Vocational-Technical Division of the Department of Education; that the Pulaski County Chancery Court determined that the transfer was in violation of Amendment 33 to the Arkansas Constitution and therefore invalidated the transfer; and that this act is necessary to clarify the law regarding the Fire Training Academy to restate that the Fire Training Academy is under the control of the Southern Arkansas University, SAU — Tech. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2003, No. 1459, § 7: Apr. 16, 2003. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that fire protection services in this state are not being adequately addressed by the existing boards responsible for these services; that some fire protection services are being duplicated by the various boards; and that this act is immediately necessary because without proper services for our firefighters, their lives could be at risk. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

History.

Acts 2015, No. 961, § 2.

Subchapter 2

— Arkansas Fire Training Academy

12-13-201. Construction, operation, etc.

The Arkansas Fire Training Academy shall be under the control of SAU-Tech of Southern Arkansas University, and the university shall maintain and operate a fire service training program at the academy.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 482, § 4; 1993, No. 447, § 6; 2001, No. 178, § 1.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 1987, No. 928, § 11, repealed by Acts 2001, No. 178, § 3, transferred the Arkansas Fire Training Academy at Camden, and its properties and funds, to the control of the State Board of Vocational Education (abolished and transferred to the State Board of Workforce Education and Career Opportunities) to be under the direction of the Director of the Vocational and Technical Education Division (abolished and transferred to the Department of Workforce Education). It also provided that Academy personnel who were members of a state retirement system were eligible to continue to participate in that system.

12-13-202. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning the creation of the Arkansas Fire Training Academy Board, was repealed by Acts 2003, No. 1459, § 4. The section was derived from Acts 1983, No. 529, §§ 1-3; 1983, No. 530, §§ 1-3; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 82-151 — 82-853; Acts 1997, No. 250, § 68.

12-13-203. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning the duties of the Arkansas Fire Training Academy Board, was repealed by Acts 2003, No. 1459, § 5. The section was derived from Acts 1983, No. 529, § 4; 1983, No. 530, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-854; Acts 1993, No. 447, § 7.

12-13-204. Gifts, grants, and donations.

SAU-Tech of Southern Arkansas University is authorized to accept and receive gifts, grants, and donations for the operations and improvement of the Arkansas Fire Training Academy.

History.

Acts 1987, No. 928, § 13; 2001, No. 178, § 2.

12-13-205. Reimbursement for training expenses.

If any county, city, or town pays the cost or expenses for training a firefighter at the Arkansas Fire Training Academy or other like program and another county, city, or town or an agency of the State of Arkansas employs that firefighter within eighteen (18) months after completion of the training in a position requiring a certificate of training from the academy, the state agency, county, city, or town so employing the firefighter, at the time of employing the firefighter, shall reimburse the county, city, or town for all or a portion of the expenses incurred by the county, city, or town for the training of the firefighter at the academy, unless the firefighter has been terminated by the county, city, or town which paid the costs or expenses of training, in which case no reimbursement is required from the state agency, county, city, or town hiring the firefighter.

Reimbursement may only be sought from the first state agency, county, city, or town which employs the firefighter after another county, city, or town has paid the costs or expenses of training.

Reimbursement shall include any salary, travel expenses, food, lodging, or other costs required to be paid by the county, city, or town, as follows:

If the person is employed within two (2) months after completion of the training, the employing agency shall reimburse the total cost of the training;

If the person is employed more than two (2) months but not more than six (6) months after completion of the training, the employing agency shall reimburse eighty percent (80%) of the cost of the training;

If the person is employed more than six (6) months but not more than ten (10) months after completion of the training, the employing agency shall reimburse sixty percent (60%) of the cost of the training;

If the person is employed more than ten (10) months but not more than fourteen (14) months after completion of the training, the employing agency shall reimburse forty percent (40%) of the cost of the training; or

If the person is employed more than fourteen (14) months but not more than eighteen (18) months after completion of the training, the employing agency shall reimburse twenty percent (20%) of the cost of the training.

If the person is employed more than eighteen (18) months after completion of the training, no reimbursement is required.

If any county, city, town, or state agency which employs a firefighter whose training expense was paid by another county, city, or town fails to make reimbursement for the expenses as required in subsection (a) of this section, the county, city, or town entitled to reimbursement shall notify the Treasurer of State.

The Treasurer of State shall then withhold the amount of the reimbursement due for training the firefighter from the county or municipal aid of the employing county, city, or town or from funds appropriated to the employing state agency and shall remit the amount to the county, city, or town which is entitled to the reimbursement under the provisions of this section.

Effective Dates. Acts 1981, No. 123, § 7: Feb. 19, 1981. Emergency clause provided: “The General Assembly hereby finds and determines that arson has become an epidemic in this state; that law enforcement and other authorized agencies need access to the files of insurers to more effectively fight the crime; that insurers need immunity from liability for furnishing their suspected arson files to authorized agencies; and that this act is immediately necessary to provide such immunity. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

U. Ark. Little Rock L.J.

Arkansas Law Survey, Jackson, Torts, 9 U. Ark. Little Rock L.J. 207.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 66, § 1.

Subchapter 3

— Arson Reporting-Immunity Act

12-13-301. Title.

This subchapter shall be known as the “Arson Reporting-Immunity Act”.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 123, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 66-5601.

12-13-302. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Action” includes nonaction or the failure to take action;

“Authorized agencies” means any law enforcement agency or agency or instrumentality of this state, of a county or municipality, or of the federal government which is charged with the responsibility of investigating fires;

“Immune” means that neither a civil action nor a criminal prosecution may arise from any action taken pursuant to this subchapter when actual malice on the part of the insurer or its representative against the insured is not present;

“Insurer” shall include every person engaged as indemnitor, surety, or contractor in the business of entering into contracts of insurance;

“Named insured” means the person whose name appears on the face of the policy as the insured individual; and

“Relevant information” means information having any tendency to make the existence of any fact that is of consequence to the investigation or determination of the issue more probable or less probable than it would be without the information.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 123, §§ 2, 3; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 66-5602, 66-5603.

12-13-303. Disclosure of information.

Any authorized agency may, in writing, require the insurer at interest to release to the requesting agency relevant information relating to the fire loss in question which may include, but is not limited to:

Policy premium payment records;

History of previous claims made by the insured; and

Material relating to the insurer's investigation of the fire loss.

Any insurer having reason to believe that a fire loss in which it has an interest may be of other than accidental cause shall, in writing, notify an authorized agency of the finding.

When an insurer notifies any one (1) of the authorized agencies pursuant to this subchapter, it shall be sufficient notice for the purpose of this subchapter.

Nothing in this subsection shall abrogate or impair the rights or powers created under subsection (a) of this section.

The authorized agency provided with information pursuant to subsection (a) or subsection (b) of this section and in furtherance of its own purposes may release or provide the information to any other authorized agency of this or another state, or of the United States to the extent that its disclosure or use is relevant to a loss by fire of real or personal property which is under investigation by the authorized agency.

When an insurer enters into a contract of insurance against fire loss with the insured, the requirements of this subchapter must be disclosed in writing to the insured.

Any insurer providing information to an authorized agency pursuant to this subchapter shall notify its insured in writing of such an action no later than ninety (90) days after the action has been taken. A copy of the report furnished the authorized agency shall be furnished to the insured upon the commencement of civil action or criminal prosecution.

Any insurer, or a person acting on its behalf, shall be immune from liability in any civil or criminal proceeding for any statement made or action required by this subchapter when actual malice on the part of the insurer or its representative is not present.

Cross References. False claims or proofs, §23-66-301.

Insurer's violation of notification requirement of this section was relevant to bad faith claim; consequently, testimony concerning insurer's noncompliance should have been admitted and instructions setting out requirements of this subchapter should have been given. Thomas v. Farm Bureau Ins. Co., 287 Ark. 313, 698 S.W.2d 508 (1985).

History.

Acts 1981, No. 123, § 3; 1983, No. 415, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 66-5603.

12-13-304. Confidentiality.

Any information furnished to any authorized agency pursuant to this subchapter shall be held in confidence by the authorized agency and shall be released only for use in a civil or criminal proceeding as authorized by a court of competent jurisdiction.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 123, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 66-5604.

12-13-305. Enforcement.

No person shall knowingly refuse to provide authorized agencies with relevant information pursuant to this subchapter.

No person shall fail to hold in confidence information required to be held in confidence by this subchapter.

Whoever violates this section is guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.

Cross References. Fines, §5-4-201.

Imprisonment, §5-4-401.

Effective Dates. Acts 1989, No. 468, § 7: Mar. 10, 1989. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that under the present laws protection of the State Capitol grounds is inadequate; that this act is designed to maintain proper order and decorum, prevent unlawful assemblies, exclude and eject persons detrimental to the well-being of the State Capitol grounds and regulate the operation and parking of motor vehicles in the Capitol Zoning District and that this law should be given effect immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1997, No. 976, § 25: July 1, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-First General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 1997 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1997 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1997.”

Acts 2017, No. 474, § 2: Became law without Governor's signature, Mar. 13, 2017. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this exemption is needed for the security of the State Capitol Building and Capitol Hill apartment complex; that this act protects confidential records belonging to the State Capitol Police; and that this act is immediately necessary because currently this exemption does not exist in law. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Establish the State Capitol Police;

Organize the State Capitol Police;

Prescribe the State Capitol Police's duties; and

Define the State Capitol Police's powers.

Amendments. The 2005 amendment added the subdivision (1) designation in (b); added (b)(2); and added “or within the boundaries of the State of Arkansas” at the end of (c).

Have the authority to regulate the operation and parking of motor vehicles upon the State Capitol grounds and other grounds under control of the Secretary of State and upon all streets adjoining and traversing the State Capitol grounds, as long as it does not impede normal traffic patterns.

Amendments. The 2005 amendment inserted “or within the boundaries of the State of Arkansas” in (b).

History.

Acts 1981, No. 123, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 66-5605.

12-12-205. Missing Persons Information Clearinghouse — Definitions.

Subchapter 6

— Knife and Gunshot Wound Reporting